Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0286.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. It shall be necessary for all All parties intending to be married to must obtain a marriage license from the county clerk of the county in which either the man or woman party resides, and to must deliver the said license to the clergyman or magistrate person who is to officiate as authorized under section 7 of 1846 RS 83, MCL 551.7, before the marriage can be performed. If both parties to be married are non-residents nonresidents of the this state, it shall be necessary to 1 party must obtain such the license from the county clerk of the county in which the marriage is to be performed. Sec. 4. It shall be the duty of the clergyman or magistrate, The person officiating at a marriage as authorized under section 7 of 1846 RS 83, MCL 551.7 , to shall fill in the spaces of the certificate left blank for the entry of the time and place of the marriage, the names and residences signatures of 2 witnesses, and his own the name, title, address, and signature of the person officiating the marriage as authorized under section 7 of 1846 RS 83, MCL 551.7, in certification that the marriage has been performed by him and any the person officiating the marriage. Any and all information required to be filled in in the spaces left blank in the certificate shall must be typewritten or legibly printed. He The person officiating the marriage as authorized under section 7 of 1846 RS 83, MCL 551.7, shall separate the duplicate license and certificate, and deliver the half part designated duplicate to 1 of the parties, so joined in marriage, and within 10 days return the original to the county clerk issuing the same. It shall be the duty of such clergyman or magistrate to The person officiating the marriage as authorized under section 7 of 1846 RS 83, MCL 551.7, shall keep an accurate record of all marriages solemnized in a book used expressly for that purpose. Sec. 6. Any clergyman or magistrate who shall join person authorized to officiate a marriage under section 7 of 1846 RS 83, MCL 551.7, that joins together in marriage parties who have not delivered to him a properly issued license, as provided for in this act, or who shall violate any of the provisions of that violates this act, shall be adjudged is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall must be punished by a fine of 100 dollars, $500.00, or in default of the payment, thereof, by imprisonment in the county jail for a term of 90 days. Enacting section 1 This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 285 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.